Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1993.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 82.04.2905 and 2024 c 195 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) ((Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, upon every person engaging within this state in the business of providing child care for periods of less than twenty-four hours, the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.(2) Until January 1, 2035, this))This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a child care provider for the care and supervision for periods of less than 24 hours of children:(a) Under 13 years of age; or(b) Under 19 years of age who have a verified special need or are under court supervision as determined by the department of children, youth, and families under chapter 43.216 RCW.(((3)))(2) The exemption under subsection (((2)))(1) of this section applies only to persons primarily engaged in the business of providing child care.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to this act.--- END ---